District of Columbia statutes.
36-409

Applicability.

This chapter does not apply to misappropriation occurring prior to March 16, 1989. With respect to a continuing misappropriation that began prior to March 16, 1989, the chapter does not apply to the continuing misappropriation that occurs after March 16, 1989.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-216, § 10, 36 DCR 519

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 48-509.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 11 of the Uniform Trade Secrets Act.